tests/кенгуру.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах кенгуру":
    кенгуру<n><nom> :  кенгуру 
    кенгуру<n><gen> :  кенгурун 
    кенгуру<n><dat> :  кенгуруна 
    кенгуру<n><loc> :  кенгурура 
    кенгуру<n><abl> :  кенгуруран 
    кенгуру<n><ins> :  кенгурупа 
    кенгуру<n><abe> :  кенгурусӑр 
    кенгуру<n><ben> :  кенгурушӑн
    кенгуру<n><px1sg><nom> :  кенгурум 
    кенгуру<n><px1sg><gen> :  кенгурумӑн 
    кенгуру<n><px1sg><dat> :  кенгурума 
    кенгуру<n><px1sg><loc> :  кенгурумра 
    кенгуру<n><px1sg><abl> :  кенгурумран 
    кенгуру<n><px1sg><ins> :  кенгурумпа 
    кенгуру<n><px1sg><abe> :  кенгурумсӑр 
    кенгуру<n><px1sg><ben> :  кенгурумшӑн
    кенгуру<n><px2sg><nom> :  кенгуру 
    кенгуру<n><px2sg><gen> :  кенгурун 
    кенгуру<n><px2sg><dat> :  кенгуруна 
    кенгуру<n><px2sg><loc> :  кенгурунта 
    кенгуру<n><px2sg><abl> :  кенгурунтан 
    кенгуру<n><px2sg><ins> :  кенгурупа 
    кенгуру<n><px2sg><abe> :  кенгурусӑр 
    кенгуру<n><px2sg><ben> :  кенгурушӑн
    кенгуру<n><px3sp><nom> :  кенгурӑвӗ 
    кенгуру<n><px3sp><gen> :  кенгурӑвӗн 
    кенгуру<n><px3sp><dat> :  кенгурӑвӗне 
    кенгуру<n><px3sp><loc> :  кенгурӑвӗнче 
    кенгуру<n><px3sp><abl> :  кенгурӑвӗнчен 
    кенгуру<n><px3sp><ins> :  кенгурӑвӗпе 
    кенгуру<n><px3sp><abe> :  кенгурӑвӗсӗр 
    кенгуру<n><px3sp><ben> :  кенгурӑвӗшӗн
    кенгуру<n><px1pl><nom> :  кенгурумӑр 
    кенгуру<n><px1pl><gen> :  кенгурумӑрӑн 
    кенгуру<n><px1pl><dat> :  кенгурумӑра 
    кенгуру<n><px1pl><loc> :  кенгурумӑрта 
    кенгуру<n><px1pl><abl> :  кенгурумӑртан 
    кенгуру<n><px1pl><ins> :  кенгурумӑрпа 
    кенгуру<n><px1pl><abe> :  кенгурумӑрсӑр 
    кенгуру<n><px1pl><ben> :  кенгурумӑршӑн
    кенгуру<n><px2pl><nom> :  кенгурӑр 
    кенгуру<n><px2pl><gen> :  кенгурӑрӑн 
    кенгуру<n><px2pl><dat> :  кенгурӑра 
    кенгуру<n><px2pl><loc> :  кенгурӑрта 
    кенгуру<n><px2pl><abl> :  кенгурӑртан 
    кенгуру<n><px2pl><ins> :  кенгурӑрпа 
    кенгуру<n><px2pl><abe> :  кенгурӑрсӑр 
    кенгуру<n><px2pl><ben> :  кенгурӑршӑн
    кенгуру<n><pl><nom> :  кенгурусем 
    кенгуру<n><pl><gen> :  кенгурусен 
    кенгуру<n><pl><dat> :  кенгурусене 
    кенгуру<n><pl><loc> :  кенгурусенче 
    кенгуру<n><pl><abl> :  кенгурусенчен 
    кенгуру<n><pl><ins> :  кенгурусемпе 
    кенгуру<n><pl><abe> :  кенгурусемсӗр 
    кенгуру<n><pl><ben> :  кенгурусемшӗн
    кенгуру<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  кенгурумсем 
    кенгуру<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  кенгурумсен 
    кенгуру<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  кенгурумсене 
    кенгуру<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  кенгурумсенче 
    кенгуру<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  кенгурумсенчен 
    кенгуру<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  кенгурумсемпе 
    кенгуру<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  кенгурумсемсӗр 
    кенгуру<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  кенгурумсемшӗн
    кенгуру<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  кенгурусем 
    кенгуру<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  кенгурусен 
    кенгуру<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  кенгурусене 
    кенгуру<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  кенгурусенче 
    кенгуру<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  кенгурусенчен 
    кенгуру<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  кенгурусемпе 
    кенгуру<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  кенгурусемсӗр 
    кенгуру<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  кенгурусемшӗн
    кенгуру<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  кенгурӑвӗсем 
    кенгуру<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  кенгурӑвӗсен 
    кенгуру<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  кенгурӑвӗсене 
    кенгуру<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  кенгурӑвӗсенче 
    кенгуру<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  кенгурӑвӗсенчен 
    кенгуру<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  кенгурӑвӗсемпе 
    кенгуру<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  кенгурӑвӗсемсӗр 
    кенгуру<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  кенгурӑвӗсемшӗн
    кенгуру<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  кенгурумӑрсем 
    кенгуру<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  кенгурумӑрсен 
    кенгуру<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  кенгурумӑрсене 
    кенгуру<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  кенгурумӑрсенче 
    кенгуру<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  кенгурумӑрсенчен 
    кенгуру<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  кенгурумӑрсемпе 
    кенгуру<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  кенгурумӑрсемсӗр 
    кенгуру<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  кенгурумӑрсемшӗн
    кенгуру<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  кенгурӑрсем 
    кенгуру<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  кенгурӑрсен 
    кенгуру<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  кенгурӑрсене 
    кенгуру<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  кенгурӑрсенче 
    кенгуру<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  кенгурӑрсенчен 
    кенгуру<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  кенгурӑрсемпе 
    кенгуру<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  кенгурӑрсемсӗр 
    кенгуру<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  кенгурӑрсемшӗн
